District of Columbia statutes.
47-2853.132

Eligibility requirements.

(a)

An applicant for licensure as a professional engineer shall establish to the satisfaction of the Board of Professional Engineers that the applicant:

(1)

Is of good character and reputation;

(2)

Is a graduate of an accredited college or university with a degree in engineering based on a four year curriculum in engineering that is acceptable to the Board;

(3)

Has passed an examination on the principles and practice of engineering prescribed by rule or has passed any other examination issued by a national certifying organization or state that is acceptable to the Board; and

(4)

Meets any other requirements established by rule to ensure that the applicant has had the proper training, experience, and qualifications to practice as a professional engineer.

(b)

The Board of Professional Engineering may also provide, by regulation, for the registration or licensure of an applicant as an engineer-in-training who meets such standards as the Board shall establish.

Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 1002, 46 DCR 3142
1981 Ed., § 47-2853.132.